Ohio, session 136, SB472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.506 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.506. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of United States route number sixty-two between interstate route number seventy-one and Monypenny avenue, in the municipal corporation of Columbus, shall be known as the "State Senator I. Ray Miller Jr. Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.